Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.020 is amended to read as follows:
The Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky shall:
(1) Develop and implement the strategic agenda with the advice and counsel of the
Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education. The council shall provide for and
direct the planning process and subsequent strategic implementation plans based on
the strategic agenda as provided in KRS 164.0203;
(2) Revise the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan with the advice and
counsel of the committee as set forth in KRS 164.004;
(3) Develop a system of public accountability related to the strategic agenda by
evaluating the performance and effectiveness of the state's postsecondary system.
The council shall prepare a report in conjunction with the accountability reporting
described in KRS 164.095, which shall be submitted to the committee, the
Governor, and the General Assembly by December 1 annually. This report shall
include a description of contributions by postsecondary institutions to the quality of
elementary and secondary education in the Commonwealth;
(4) Review, revise, and approve the missions of the state's universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System. The Council on
Postsecondary Education shall have the final authority to determine the compliance
of postsecondary institutions with their academic, service, and research missions;
(5) Establish and ensure that all postsecondary institutions in Kentucky cooperatively
provide for an integrated system of postsecondary education. The council shall
guard against inappropriate and unnecessary conflict and duplication by promoting
transferability of credits and easy access of information among institutions;
(6) Engage in analyses and research to determine the overall needs of postsecondary
education and adult education in the Commonwealth;
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
(7) Develop plans that may be required by federal legislation. The council shall for all
purposes of federal legislation relating to planning be considered the "single state
agency" as that term may be used in federal legislation. When federal legislation
requires additional representation on any "single state agency," the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall establish advisory groups necessary to satisfy federal
legislative or regulatory guidelines;
(8) (a) Determine tuition and approve the minimum qualifications for admission to
the state postsecondary educational system. In defining residency, the council
shall classify a student as having Kentucky residency if the student met the
residency requirements at the beginning of his or her last year in high school
and enters a Kentucky postsecondary education institution within two (2)
years of high school graduation and is not an alien illegally present in the
United States. In determining the tuition for non-Kentucky residents, the
council shall consider the fees required of Kentucky students by institutions in
adjoining states, the resident fees charged by other states, the total actual per
student cost of training in the institutions for which the fees are being
determined, and the ratios of Kentucky students to non-Kentucky students
comprising the enrollments of the respective institutions, and other factors the
council may in its sole discretion deem pertinent, except that the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System may assess a mandatory student
fee not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per credit hour to be used exclusively for
debt service on amounts not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total
projects cost of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
agency bond projects included in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part II, J., 11.
(b) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System mandatory fee
established in this subsection shall only be used for debt service on agency
bond projects.
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
(c) Any fee established as provided by this subsection shall cease to be assessed
upon the retirement of the project bonds for which it services debt.
(d) Prior to the issuance of any bonds, the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System shall certify in writing to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet that sufficient funds have been raised to meet the
local match equivalent to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total project cost;
(9) Devise, establish, and periodically review and revise policies to be used in making
recommendations to the Governor for consideration in developing
recommendations to the General Assembly for appropriations to the universities,
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and to support strategies
for persons to maintain necessary levels of literacy throughout their lifetimes. The
council has sole discretion, with advice of the Strategic Committee on
Postsecondary Education and the executive officers of the postsecondary education
system, to devise policies that provide for allocation of funds among the
universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(10) Lead and provide staff support for the biennial budget process as provided under
KRS Chapter 48, in cooperation with the committee;
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, review and approve all
capital construction projects covered by KRS 45.750(1)(f), including real
property acquisitions, and regardless of the source of funding for projects or
acquisitions. Approval of capital projects and real property acquisitions shall
be on a basis consistent with the strategic agenda and the mission of the
respective universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System.
(b) The organized groups that are establishing community college satellites as
branches of existing community colleges in the counties of Laurel, Leslie, and
Muhlenberg, and that have substantially obtained cash, pledges, real property,
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
or other commitments to build the satellite at no cost to the Commonwealth,
other than operating costs that shall be paid as part of the operating budget of
the main community college of which the satellite is a branch, are authorized
to begin construction of the satellite on or after January 1, 1998;
(12) Require reports from the executive officer of each institution it deems necessary for
the effectual performance of its duties;
(13) Ensure that the state postsecondary system does not unnecessarily duplicate
services and programs provided by private postsecondary institutions and shall
promote maximum cooperation between the state postsecondary system and private
postsecondary institutions. Receive and consider an annual report prepared by the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities stating the
condition of independent institutions, listing opportunities for more collaboration
between the state and independent institutions and other information as appropriate;
(14) Establish course credit, transfer, and degree components as required in KRS
164.2951;
(15) Define and approve the offering of all postsecondary education technical, associate,
baccalaureate, graduate, and professional degree, certificate, or diploma programs
in the public postsecondary education institutions. The council shall expedite
wherever possible the approval of requests from the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System board of regents relating to new certificate, diploma,
technical, or associate degree programs of a vocational-technical and occupational
nature. Without the consent of the General Assembly, the council shall not abolish
or limit the total enrollment of the general program offered at any community
college to meet the goal of reasonable access throughout the Commonwealth to a
two (2) year course of general studies designed for transfer to a baccalaureate
program. This does not restrict or limit the authority of the council, as set forth in
this section, to eliminate or make changes in individual programs within that
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
general program;
(16) Eliminate, in its discretion, existing programs or make any changes in existing
academic programs at the state's postsecondary educational institutions, taking into
consideration these criteria:
(a) Consistency with the institution's mission and the strategic agenda;
(b) Alignment with the priorities in the strategic implementation plan for
achieving the strategic agenda;
(c) Elimination of unnecessary duplication of programs within and among
institutions; and
(d) Efforts to create cooperative programs with other institutions through
traditional means, or by use of distance learning technology and electronic
resources, to achieve effective and efficient program delivery;
(17) Ensure the governing board and faculty of all postsecondary education institutions
are committed to providing instruction free of discrimination against students who
hold political views and opinions contrary to those of the governing board and
faculty;
(18) Review proposals and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the
establishment of new public community colleges, technical institutions, and new
four (4) year colleges;
(19) Postpone the approval of any new program at a state postsecondary educational
institution, unless the institution has met its equal educational opportunity goals, as
established by the council. In accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the council, those institutions not meeting the goals shall be able to
obtain a temporary waiver, if the institution has made substantial progress toward
meeting its equal educational opportunity goals;
(20) Ensure the coordination, transferability, and connectivity of technology among
postsecondary institutions in the Commonwealth including the development and
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
implementation of a technology plan as a component of the strategic agenda;
(21) Approve the teacher education programs in the public institutions that comply with
standards established by the Education Professional Standards Board pursuant to
KRS 161.028;
(22) Constitute the representative agency of the Commonwealth in all matters of
postsecondary education of a general and statewide nature which are not otherwise
delegated to one (1) or more institutions of postsecondary learning. The
responsibility may be exercised through appropriate contractual relationships with
individuals or agencies located within or without the Commonwealth. The authority
includes but is not limited to contractual arrangements for programs of research,
specialized training, and cultural enrichment;
(23) Maintain procedures for the approval of a designated receiver to provide for the
maintenance of student records of the public institutions of higher education and the
colleges as defined in KRS 164.945, and institutions operating pursuant to KRS
165A.310 which offer collegiate level courses for academic credit, which cease to
operate. Procedures shall include assurances that, upon proper request, subject to
federal and state laws and regulations, copies of student records shall be made
available within a reasonable length of time for a minimum fee;
(24) Monitor and transmit a report on compliance with KRS 164.351 to the director of
the Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children;
(25) (a) Develop in cooperation with each public university and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System a comprehensive orientation and
education program for new members of the council and the governing boards
and continuing education opportunities for all council and board members.
For new members of the council and institutional governing boards, the
council shall:
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
1. Ensure that the orientation and education program comprises six (6)
hours of instruction time and includes but is not limited to information
concerning the roles of the council and governing board members, the
strategic agenda and the strategic implementation plan, and the
respective institution's mission, budget and finances, strategic plans and
priorities, institutional policies and procedures, board fiduciary
responsibilities, legal considerations including open records and open
meetings requirements, ethical considerations arising from board
membership, and the board member removal and replacement
provisions of KRS 63.080;
2. Establish delivery methods by which the orientation and education
program can be completed in person or electronically by new members
within one (1) year of their appointment or election;
3. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislative Research
Commission of those new board members who do not complete the
required orientation and education program; and
4. Invite governing board members of private colleges and universities
licensed by the Council on Postsecondary Education to participate in the
orientation and education program described in this subsection;
(b) Offer, in cooperation with the public universities and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System, continuing education
opportunities for all council and governing board members; and
(c) Review and approve the orientation programs of each public university and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for their governing
board members to ensure that all programs and information adhere to this
subsection;
(26) Develop a financial reporting procedure to be used by all state postsecondary
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
education institutions to ensure uniformity of financial information available to
state agencies and the public;
(27) Select and appoint a president of the council under KRS 164.013;
(28) Employ consultants and other persons and employees as may be required for the
council's operations, functions, and responsibilities;
(29) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A,
governing its powers, duties, and responsibilities as described in this section;
(30) Prepare and present by January 31 of each year an annual status report on
postsecondary education in the Commonwealth to the Governor, the Strategic
Committee on Postsecondary Education, and the Legislative Research Commission;
(31) Consider the role, function, and capacity of independent institutions of
postsecondary education in developing policies to meet the immediate and future
needs of the state. When it is found that independent institutions can meet state
needs effectively, state resources may be used to contract with or otherwise assist
independent institutions in meeting these needs;
(32) Create advisory groups representing the presidents, faculty, nonteaching staff, and
students of the public postsecondary education system and the independent colleges
and universities;
(33) Develop a statewide policy to promote employee and faculty development in state
and locally operated secondary area technology centers through the waiver of
tuition for college credit coursework in the public postsecondary education system.
Any regular full-time employee of a state or locally operated secondary area
technology center may, with prior administrative approval of the course offering
institution, take a maximum of six (6) credit hours per term at any public
postsecondary institution. The institution shall waive the tuition up to a maximum
of six (6) credit hours per term. The employee shall complete the Free Application
for Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and eligibility for state and
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
federal financial aid programs. The amount of tuition waived shall not exceed the
cost of tuition at the institution less any state or federal grants received, which shall
be credited first to the student's tuition;
(34) Participate with the Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Board of
Education, and postsecondary education institutions to ensure that academic content
requirements for successful entry into postsecondary education programs are
aligned with high school content standards and that students who master the high
school academic content standards shall not need remedial courses. The council
shall monitor the results on an ongoing basis;
(35) Cooperate with the Kentucky Department of Education and the Education
Professional Standards Board in providing information sessions to selected
postsecondary education content faculty and teacher educators of the high school
academic content standards as required under KRS 158.6453(2)(l);
(36) Cooperate with the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and ensure the
participation of the public institutions as required in KRS 151B.133;
(37) Pursuant to KRS 63.080, review written notices from the Governor or from a board
of trustees or board of regents concerning removal of a board member or the entire
appointed membership of a board, investigate the member or board and the conduct
alleged to support removal, and make written recommendations to the Governor
and the Legislative Research Commission as to whether the member or board
should be removed;[ and]
(38) Require and collect from each public postsecondary education institution the
immigration data of the institution's students for each semester and submit that
data to the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement; and
(39) Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant the
Council on Postsecondary Education authority to disestablish or eliminate any
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
college of law which became a part of the state system of higher education through
merger with a state college.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Law enforcement agency" means:
1. Any public agency that employs a police officer as defined in KRS
15.420(2)(a) or a special law enforcement officer as defined in KRS
61.900(6)(a) to (e);
2. Any public agency that is composed of or employs other public peace
officers;
3. Jailers;
4. Metropolitan correctional services departments operating under KRS
Chapter 67B;
5. The Department of Corrections as organized under KRS Chapter 196;
and
6. A public postsecondary education institution's police department
established under KRS 164.950;
(b) "Law enforcement official" means an elected or appointed officer, peace
officer or other employee that oversees or serves within a law enforcement
agency;
(c) "Public agency" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.870;
(d) "Public postsecondary education institution employee" means any elected
or appointed official of a public postsecondary education institution and
any other person who is employed by a public postsecondary education
institution, including a police department established under KRS 164.950;
and
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
(e) "Sanctuary policy" means an order, ordinance, resolution, or policy,
whether written or unwritten, that:
1. Limits or prohibits a public postsecondary education institution
employee from communicating or cooperating with:
a. Authorized federal agencies or federal law enforcement officers
or agencies or officers of another state; or
b. A law enforcement agency, law enforcement official, or public
agency;
to verify or report the immigration status of a person within this state;
2. Grants to aliens illegally present in the United States the right to
lawful presence or status within the boundaries of this state in
violation of federal law;
3. Violates 8 U.S.C. sec. 1373 or 1644;
4. Restricts or imposes any conditions upon a public postsecondary
education institution's cooperation or compliance with detainers or
other legal and valid requests from United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement to maintain custody of an immigrant or to
transfer an immigrant to the custody of United States Immigration
and Customs Enforcement or another authorized federal agency or
federal law enforcement officer;
5. Requires United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, or
another federal law enforcement agency or federal law enforcement
officer, to obtain a warrant or demonstrate more than probable cause
before complying with detainers or other legal and valid requests from
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to maintain
custody of an immigrant or to transfer an immigrant to the custody of
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1025
authorized federal agency or federal law enforcement officer;
6. Prevents public postsecondary education institution employees from
asking a person about his or her citizenship or immigration status; or
7. Prohibits a federal immigration officer, or other federal law
enforcement officer or a law enforcement official, from entering a jail
or other correctional facility to enforce federal immigration laws.
(2) Any public postsecondary education institution and any public postsecondary
education institution employee shall not enact, adopt, or otherwise enforce any
sanctuary policy.
(3) Any sanctuary policy adopted by a public postsecondary education institution
prior to or after the effective date of this Act that violates this section shall be
invalid, void, and unenforceable.
(4) (a) If a public postsecondary education institution negligently enrolls an alien
illegally present in the United States on or after the effective date of this Act
and that person subsequently commits an offense within this state which
would classify him or her as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401, the
victim, or the victim's family if the victim of the crime dies or sustains
serious physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080 as a result of the crime,
may file a civil action against the public postsecondary education institution
in a court of competent jurisdiction for compensatory damages, punitive
damages, costs, and attorney's fees.
(b) Sovereign, governmental, and qualified immunity that is afforded to public
postsecondary education institutions, including but not limited to immunity
under the Eleventh Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, are
waived for purposes of this subsection.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 1/10/2025 9:04 AM Jacketed